Utah statutes.
17-19a-206.   Performance audit services.

(1) (a)  A county auditor shall, under the direction and supervision of the county legislative body or county executive and subject to Subsections (1)(b) and (2), provide performance audit services for a county office, department, division, or other county entity.

(b)  A county auditor may not conduct a performance audit of the auditor's own office.

(2)  The county legislative body or county executive shall establish the goals and nature of a performance audit and related services.

(3)  A performance audit conducted in accordance with this section may include a review and audit of the following:

(a)  the honesty and integrity of financial and other affairs;

(b)  the accuracy and reliability of financial and management reports;

(c)  the adequacy of financial controls to safeguard public funds;

(d)  the management and staff adherence to statute, ordinance, policies, and legislative intent;

(e)  the economy, efficiency, and effectiveness of operational performance;

(f)  the accomplishment of intended objectives; and

(g)  whether management, financial, and information systems are adequate and effective.



Enacted by Chapter 17, 2012 General Session

